North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108D. Medicaid and NC Health Choice Managed Care Programs.
Article 4. Prepaid Health Plans.

§ 108D-30.
Intent and Goals.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to transform the State’s current Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs to programs that provide budget predictability for the taxpayers of this State while ensuring quality care to those in need. The new Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs shall be designed to achieve the following goals:

Ensure budget predictability through shared risk and accountability.

Ensure balanced quality, patient satisfaction, and financial measures.

Ensure efficient and cost-effective administrative systems and structures.

Ensure a sustainable delivery system.

History.

2015-245, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 14(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2015-245, s. 1 was codified as this section by Session Laws 2019-81, s. 14(a)(1), effective October 1, 2019.

In codifying the portions of S.L. 2015-245, as amended, that are specified in subsection (a) of this section, the Revisor of Statutes is authorized to do all of the following:

Replace references to DHHS with references to the Department or the Department of Health and Human Services, as appropriate.

Revise references to subdivision (3) of Section 4 of the session law to instead reference the codified location of the language in subdivision (3) of Section 5 of the session law.

Session Laws 2020-88, s. 11, as amended by Session Laws 2021-62, s. 3.6(a), provides: “For the first five years of the initial standard benefit plan prepaid health plan capitated contracts required under Article 4 of Chapter 108D of the General Statutes, the reimbursement for durable medical equipment and supplies, orthotics, and prosthetics under managed care shall be set at one hundred percent (100%) of the lesser of the supplier’s usual and customary rate or the maximum allowable Medicaid fee-for-service rates for durable medical equipment and supplies, orthotics, and prosthetics.”

Session Laws 2020-88, s. 12(a), provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services may contract with an Indian managed care entity (IMCE) or an Indian health care provider (IHCP), as defined under 42 C.F.R. § 438.14(a), to assist in the provision of health care or health care-related services to Medicaid and NC Health Choice beneficiaries who are members of federally recognized tribes or who are eligible to enroll in an IMCE. Contracts may include health care or health care-related services as agreed upon with the IMCE or IHCP, as approved by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services and as allowed by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), including, but not limited to, the following services:

“(1) Primary care case management as a primary care case managed system or entity, as described in 42 C.F.R. § 438.2.

“(2) Utilization management and referrals.

“(3) The management or provision of home- and community-based services under a 1915(c) waiver.

“(4) The management or provision of specialized services covered by a behavioral health and intellectual/developmental disabilities (BH/IDD) tailored plan in accordance with G.S. 108D-60(8).

“Coverage provided by the IMCE or IHCP may be more permissive, but no more restrictive, than Medicaid or NC Health Choice medical coverage policy adopted or amended by the Department of Health and Human Services; however, the coverage shall be in compliance with federal regulations and policies related to the receipt of federal funding for these health care or health care-related services.”

Session Laws 2020-88, s. 12(d), provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services is authorized to seek approval from CMS and submit any necessary State Plan Amendments and waivers, or any amendments thereto, to implement the provisions of this section.”

§ 108D-35.
Services covered by PHPs.

Capitated PHP contracts shall cover all Medicaid and NC Health Choice services, including physical health services, prescription drugs, long-term services and supports, and behavioral health services for NC Health Choice recipients, except as otherwise provided in this section. The capitated contracts required by this section shall not cover:

Medicaid services covered by the local management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs) under the combined 1915(b) and (c) waivers shall not be covered under a standard benefit plan, except that all capitated PHP contracts shall cover the following services:

Inpatient behavioral health services.

Outpatient behavioral health emergency room services.

Outpatient behavioral health services provided by direct-enrolled providers.

Mobile crisis management services.

Facility-based crisis services for children and adolescents.

Professional treatment services in a facility-based crisis program.

Outpatient opioid treatment services.

Ambulatory detoxification services.

Nonhospital medical detoxification services.

Partial hospitalization.

Medically supervised or alcohol and drug abuse treatment center detoxification crisis stabilization.

Research-based intensive behavioral health treatment.

Diagnostic assessment services.

Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment services.

Peer support services.

(For contingency, see editor’s note) Behavioral health urgent care services.

In accordance with this subdivision, 1915(b)(3) services shall not be covered under a standard benefit plan.

Dental services.

Services provided through the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE).

Services documented in an individualized education program, as defined in

G.S. 115C-106.3

, or other document described in the Medicaid State Plan, and provided or billed by a local education agency, as defined in

G.S. 115C-106.3

.

Services documented in an individualized family service plan under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1436, that are provided and billed by a Children’s Developmental Services Agency or by a provider contracted with a Children’s Developmental Services Agency to provide those services.

Services for Medicaid program applicants during the period of time prior to eligibility determination.

The fabrication of eyeglasses, including complete eyeglasses, eyeglass lenses, and ophthalmic frames.

History.

2015-245, s. 4; 2016-121, s. 2(b); 2017-57, s. 11H.17(a); 2017-186, s. 4; 2018-48, s. 1; 2019-81, ss. 12, 14(a); 2021-62, ss. 3.2, 4.9(a); 2021-180, s. 9F.11(c).

Contingent Effective Date.

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
9F.11 made the addition of sub-subdivision (1)o. by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9F.11(c)
contingent upon certain requirements being met.
For details on those contingencies, see the note under the heading “Behaviorial Health Urgent Care Pilot Program.”

Require LME/MCOS to Pay for Behavioral Health Services Provided to Beneficiaries Awaiting Hospital Discharge.

Session Laws
2018-180, s. 9D.22(a)-(h), provides: “(a) Intent. — It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide funding to hospitals for behavioral health services provided to Medicaid beneficiaries while those beneficiaries await discharge to a more appropriate setting.

“(b) Criteria for Coverage. — The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), is directed to develop a clinical coverage policy, or amend an existing clinical coverage policy as applicable, assign a CPT code, and develop billing instructions for Medicaid coverage of the services described in subsection (c) of this section provided to a beneficiary who meets all of the following criteria:

“(1) The beneficiary no longer meets criteria for observation under Section 3.2.1(b) of Medicaid Clinical Coverage Policy 2A 1: Acute Inpatient Hospital Services.

“(2) The beneficiary is not currently receiving inpatient behavioral health services covered under Medicaid Clinical Coverage Policy 8B: Inpatient Behavioral Health Services.

“(3) A physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner has determined that one of the following actions is appropriate for the beneficiary:

“a. Admission to an inpatient psychiatric or behavioral health facility.

“b. Admission to a facility, other than an inpatient facility, for care for psychiatric or behavioral health needs, such as a group home.

“c. Arrangement for community based services or supports without which the beneficiary cannot be safely discharged to the beneficiary's home due to the beneficiary's psychiatric or behavioral health needs.

“(4) The beneficiary has been in the care of the hospital for a minimum of 30 continuous hours.

“(c) Services Covered. — The clinical coverage policy developed in accordance with this section shall provide Medicaid coverage of the following services in an acute care hospital setting when medically necessary and ordered by a physician or other appropriate provider:

“(1) Treatment, including assessment and medication management, of both psychiatric and behavioral health conditions and physical health conditions.

“(2) Crisis stabilization and support.

“(3) Ongoing monitoring of a beneficiary's medical status and medical clearance.

“(4) Nursing services and support.

“(5) Reasonable and appropriate efforts to maintain patient safety.

“(6) Provision of community resource information and psychoeducation, including connections to the relevant local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO).

“(7) Development of a safety plan, including any revisions to that plan.

“(8) Coordination with the beneficiary or the beneficiary's legal representative and the LME/MCO to establish a safe discharge plan or transfer plan.

“Services developed in accordance with this subsection shall be considered outpatient services. Other ancillary services, such as laboratory services, imaging, and prescription drugs, shall continue to be billed as separate and additional services not included as part of this new Medicaid coverage. Notwithstanding G.S. 108D 35, any new services developed in accordance with this subsection shall be limited to beneficiaries enrolled in NC Medicaid Direct or in a BH IDD tailored plan, as defined in G.S. 108D 1.

“(d) Reimbursement for Beneficiaries Enrolled in NC Medicaid Direct. — Services covered under the Medicaid clinical coverage policy developed in accordance with subsection (b) of this section and provided to beneficiaries enrolled in NC Medicaid Direct who are not also enrolled with an LME/MCO shall be reimbursed at a fee for service rate determined by DHB.

“(e) Reimbursement for Beneficiaries Enrolled in an LME/MCO or a BH IDD Tailored Plan. — Services covered under the Medicaid clinical coverage policy developed in accordance with subsection (b) of this section shall be covered by LME/MCOs, including LME/MCOs operating BH IDD tailored plans. If a beneficiary who is an enrollee of an LME/MCO or a BH IDD tailored plan receives these services, then the applicable LME/MCO shall be responsible for making the reimbursement payment to the hospital billing for the services. The reimbursement amount shall be determined through negotiations between each hospital and LME/MCO. If an LME/MCO and any hospital are unable to negotiate a reimbursement amount for these services, then the reimbursement rate shall be the most prevalent semiprivate room rate at the applicable hospital.

“(f) CMS Approval. — The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, shall submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) any State Plan amendments necessary to establish the new Medicaid coverage required by this section. The new Medicaid covered services and rates shall be implemented July 1, 2022. If approval from CMS is not granted by July 1, 2022, DHB shall retroactively implement services and rates upon approval from CMS to July 1, 2022. The new Medicaid covered services and rates shall only be implemented to the extent allowable by CMS.

“(g) Capitation Rates. — It is the intent of the General Assembly that there will be no increase in the capitation rates paid to LME/MCOs for any services developed under this section. If an increase in capitation rates paid to LME/MCOs is necessary to maintain the actuarial soundness of those paid capitation rates, then DHB shall increase the capitation rates by the minimum amount necessary for federal approval of the rates.

“(h) Effective Date. — This section is effective when it becomes law.” This section became effective November 18, 2021.

Behavioral Health Urgent Care Pilot Program.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9F.11(a), (b), (d)-(g), provides: “(a) BHUC Pilot Program. — Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services (DMH/DD/SAS), the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2021-2022 fiscal year and the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2022-2023 fiscal year shall be allocated to Recovery Innovations, Inc., a nonprofit corporation, for the Dix Crisis Intervention Center (Dix Crisis Center) in Onslow County to be used for a behavioral health urgent care (BHUC) pilot program. The purpose of the BHUC pilot program is to serve individuals experiencing a mental health crisis episode anticipated to require a length of stay not to exceed 23 hours, while ensuring continuity of care for individuals who ultimately require a longer length of stay to fully address the crisis episode. The BHUC pilot program period shall end June 30, 2023.

“(b) Service Definition. — Dix Crisis Center and Trillium Health Resources shall act in good faith to continue their contractual relationship. Trillium Health Resources, the local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO) for Onslow County, shall develop, and seek approval from the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), for, a Medicaid "in lieu of" or other alternative service definition to ensure that services received by individuals under the BHUC pilot program are eligible to be reimbursed through the North Carolina Medicaid program. The State-funded behavioral health urgent care service definition shall be used as a model for the Medicaid service definition.

“(d) Notification of Approval. — The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services shall notify the Revisor of Statutes of the approval and effective date of the "in lieu of" or other alternative Medicaid service definition by DHB, as required by subsection (b) of this section. If no approval has been given on or before June 30, 2023, then subsection (c) of this section shall expire on July 1, 2023.

“(e) Additional Access to BHUC Services. — Dix Crisis Center shall make good-faith efforts to contract with commercial insurance carriers operating in this State, Tri-Care, and any other health benefit plan to the extent that the plan offers coverage for BHUC services.

“(f) Dix Crisis Center Reporting. — By August 1, 2023, Dix Crisis Center shall submit to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services (DMH/DD/SAS), a written report of all BHUC services provided under the BHUC pilot program authorized by this section. The report shall include at least all of the following information:

“(1) In aggregate, the number of individuals receiving behavioral health care services, the average length of stay in the BHUC unit, and the average number of repeat crisis episodes experienced by individuals receiving services at the Dix Crisis Center.

“(2) A comparison of the average length of stay and average number of repeat crisis episodes experienced by individuals served by the BHUC unit and the facility-based crisis unit at Dix Crisis Center.

“(3) The level of BHUC unit occupancy during the BHUC pilot program.

“(4) Additional objective outcome measures that demonstrate the impact and effectiveness of the BHUC pilot program, including the number of individuals presenting to a hospital emergency room with a behavioral health crisis and time spent by county and municipal law enforcement in responding to behavioral health crises.

“(5) A detailed budget and list of expenditures funded by State appropriations.

“(g) DHHS Reporting. — By October 1, 2023, DMH/DD/SAS shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, and the Fiscal Research Division on the BHUC pilot program authorized by this section. The report shall include, at a minimum, the information described in subdivisions (1) through (5) of subsection (f) of this section.”

Editor’s Note.

Subdivision (4) of Session Laws
2015-245, s. 4, as amended by Session Laws
2016-121, s. 2(b), Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11H.17(a), Session Laws
2017-186, s. 4, Session Laws
2018-48, s. 1, and Session Laws
2019-81, s. 12,
was codified as this section by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(2), effective October 1, 2019.

Session Laws 2021-62, s. 3.2, and Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9F.11(c), each added a new sub-subdivision (1)o. At the direction of the Revisor of Statutes, the sub-subdivision added by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9F.11(c) was redesignated as sub-subdivision (1)p.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-62, s. 3.2, effective June 29, 2021, rewrote subdivision (1).

Session Laws 2021-62, s. 4.9(a), effective June 29, 2021, rewrote subdivision (5).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9F.11(c) added sub-subdivision (1)o. For effective date, see the contingent effective date note. For redesignation of sub-subdivision, see editor's note.

§ 108D-40.
Populations covered by PHPs.

Capitated PHP contracts shall cover all Medicaid and NC Health Choice program aid categories except for the following categories:

Recipients who are enrolled in both Medicare and Medicaid for whom Medicaid coverage is limited to the coverage of Medicare premiums and cost sharing.

Qualified aliens subject to the five-year bar for means-tested public assistance under 8 U.S.C. § 1613 who qualify for emergency services under 8 U.S.C. § 1611.

Undocumented aliens who qualify for emergency services under 8 U.S.C. § 1611.

Medically needy Medicaid recipients.

Recipients who meet the definition of Indian under 42 C.F.R. § 438.14(a) shall have the option to enroll voluntarily in PHPs.

(5a)

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-62, s. 4.8(c), effective July 1, 2021.

Presumptively eligible recipients, during the period of presumptive eligibility.

Recipients who participate in the North Carolina Health Insurance Premium Payment (NC HIPP) program.

Recipients enrolled under the Medicaid Family Planning program.

Recipients who are inmates of prisons.

Recipients being served through the Community Alternatives Program for Children (CAP/C).

Recipients being served through the Community Alternatives Program for Disabled Adults (CAP/DA).

Recipients with a serious mental illness, a serious emotional disturbance, a severe substance use disorder, an intellectual/developmental disability, or who have survived a traumatic brain injury and who are receiving traumatic brain injury services, who are on the waiting list for the Traumatic Brain Injury waiver, or whose traumatic brain injury otherwise is a knowable fact, until BH IDD tailored plans become operational, at which time this population will be enrolled with a BH IDD tailored plan in accordance with G.S. 108D-60(10). Recipients in this category shall have the option to voluntarily enroll with a PHP, provided that (i) a recipient electing to enroll with a PHP would only have access to the behavioral health services covered by PHPs according to G.S. 108D-35(1) and would no longer have access to the behavioral health services excluded under G.S. 108D-35(1) and (ii) the recipient’s informed consent shall be required prior to the recipient’s enrollment with a PHP. Recipients in this category shall include, at a minimum, recipients who meet any of the following criteria:

Individuals with a serious emotional disturbance or a diagnosis of severe substance use disorder or traumatic brain injury.

Individuals with a developmental disability as defined in G.S. 122C-3(12a).

Individuals with a mental illness diagnosis who also meet any of the following criteria:

Individuals with serious mental illness or serious and persistent mental illness, as those terms are defined in the 2012 settlement agreement between the Department and the United States Department of Justice, including individuals enrolled in and served under the Transition to Community Living Initiative settlement agreement.

Individuals with two or more psychiatric hospitalizations or readmissions within the prior 18 months.

Individuals who have had two or more visits to the emergency department for a psychiatric problem within the prior 18 months, except as provided in this sub-subdivision. After any individual who is enrolled with a PHP has a second visit to the emergency department for a psychiatric problem within the prior 18 months, the individual shall remain enrolled with the PHP until the Department provides a comprehensive assessment to determine whether the individual should be disenrolled from the PHP and receive more comprehensive care through an LME/MCO or an entity operating a BH IDD tailored plan. This assessment shall be completed within 14 calendar days following discharge after the second visit. If the result of the assessment is that the individual does not meet the criteria for disenrolling from the PHP, then the individual shall not be included in the category of recipients with a serious mental illness for purposes of this subsection, unless the individual has a subsequent visit to the emergency department for a psychiatric problem within 12 months after completion of the assessment.

Individuals known to the Department or an LME/MCO to have had one or more involuntary treatment episodes within the prior 18 months.

Individuals who, regardless of diagnosis, meet any of the following criteria:

Individuals who have had two or more episodes using behavioral health crisis services within the prior 18 months, except as provided in this sub-sub-subdivision. After any individual who is enrolled with a PHP experiences a second episode of behavioral health crisis, the individual shall remain enrolled with the PHP until the Department provides a comprehensive assessment to determine whether the individual should be disenrolled from the PHP and receive more comprehensive care through an LME/MCO or an entity operating a BH IDD tailored plan. This assessment shall be completed within 14 calendar days following discharge after the second episode using behavioral health crisis services. If the result of the assessment is that the individual does not meet the criteria for disenrolling from the PHP, then the individual shall not be included in the category of recipients with a serious mental illness, a serious emotional disturbance, a severe substance use disorder, an intellectual/developmental disability, or who have survived a traumatic brain injury and who are receiving traumatic brain injury services, who are on the waiting list for the Traumatic Brain Injury waiver, or whose traumatic brain injury otherwise is a knowable fact for purposes of this subsection, unless the individual has a subsequent episode using behavioral health crisis services within 12 months after completion of the assessment.

Individuals receiving any of the behavioral health, intellectual and developmental disability, or traumatic brain injury services that are covered by LME/MCOs under the combined 1915(b) and (c) waivers and that shall not be covered through a standard benefit plan in accordance with G.S. 108D-35(1).

Individuals who are currently receiving or need to be receiving behavioral health, intellectual and developmental disability, or traumatic brain injury services funded with State, local, federal, or other non-Medicaid funds, or any combination of non-Medicaid funds, in addition to the services covered by Medicaid.

Children with complex needs, as that term is defined in the 2016 settlement agreement between the Department and Disability Rights of North Carolina.

Children aged zero to three years old with, or at risk for, developmental delay or disability.

Children and youth involved with the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and Delinquency Prevention Programs who meet criteria established by the Department of Health and Human Services.

Recipients in the following categories shall not be covered by PHPs for a period of time to be determined by the Department that shall not exceed five years after the date that capitated PHP contracts begin:

Recipients who (i) reside in a nursing facility and have so resided, or are likely to reside, for a period of 90 days or longer and (ii) are not being served through the Community Alternatives Program for Disabled Adults (CAP/DA). During the period of exclusion from PHP coverage for this population as determined by the Department in accordance with this subdivision, if an individual enrolled in a PHP resides in a nursing facility for 90 days or more, then that individual shall be excluded from PHP coverage on the first day of the month following the ninetieth day of the stay in the nursing facility and shall be disenrolled from the PHP.

Recipients who are enrolled in both Medicare and Medicaid and for whom Medicaid coverage is not limited to the coverage of Medicare premiums and cost sharing. This sub-subdivision shall not include recipients being served through the Community Alternatives Program for Disabled Adults (CAP/DA).

Recipients who are (i) enrolled in the foster care system, (ii) receiving Title IV-E adoption assistance, (iii) under the age of 26 and formerly were in the foster care system, or (iv) under the age of 26 and formerly received adoption assistance.

If a recipient in any of the categories excluded from PHP coverage under

G.S. 108D-40

is eligible to receive a service that is not available in the fee-for-service program but is offered by a PHP, the recipient may be enrolled in a PHP.

History.

2015-245, s. 4; 2016-121, s. 2(b); 2018-48, s. 1; 2018-49, s. 5; 2019-81, ss. 12, 14(a); 2020-88, s. 12(b); 2021-62, s. 4.8(b), (c).

Editor’s Note.

Subdivisions (5) and (5a) of Session Laws 2015-245, s. 4, as amended by Session Laws 2016-121, s. 2(b), Session Laws 2018-48, s. 1, Session Laws 2018-49, s. 5, and Session Laws 2019-81, s. 12,
were codified as this section by Session Laws 2019-81, s. 14(a)(3) and (a)(4), effective October 1, 2019.

Pursuant to Session Laws 2019-81, s. 14(b), references to “the Department” or “the Department of Health and Human Services” were substituted for “DHHS,” as appropriate.

Session Laws 2020-88, s. 12(a), provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services may contract with an Indian managed care entity (IMCE) or an Indian health care provider (IHCP), as defined under 42 C.F.R. § 438.14(a), to assist in the provision of health care or health care-related services to Medicaid and NC Health Choice beneficiaries who are members of federally recognized tribes or who are eligible to enroll in an IMCE. Contracts may include health care or health care-related services as agreed upon with the IMCE or IHCP, as approved by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services and as allowed by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), including, but not limited to, the following services:

“(1) Primary care case management as a primary care case managed system or entity, as described in 42 C.F.R. § 438.2.

“(2) Utilization management and referrals.

“(3) The management or provision of home- and community-based services under a 1915(c) waiver.

“(4) The management or provision of specialized services covered by a behavioral health and intellectual/developmental disabilities (BH/IDD) tailored plan in accordance with G.S. 108D-60(8).

“Coverage provided by the IMCE or IHCP may be more permissive, but no more restrictive, than Medicaid or NC Health Choice medical coverage policy adopted or amended by the Department of Health and Human Services; however, the coverage shall be in compliance with federal regulations and policies related to the receipt of federal funding for these health care or health care-related services.”

Session Laws 2020-88, s. 12(d), provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services is authorized to seek approval from CMS and submit any necessary State Plan Amendments and waivers, or any amendments thereto, to implement the provisions of this section.”

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 4.5, as amended by Session Laws 2021-62, s. 1.1(a), provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), is authorized to provide the Medicaid coverage described in 42 U.S.C.A. § 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XXIII), which covers COVID-19 testing for certain uninsured individuals during the period in which there is a declared nationwide public health emergency as a result of the 2019 novel coronavirus, and for which the federal medical assistance percentage is one hundred percent (100%). DHB is authorized to provide this medical assistance retroactively to the earliest date allowable. Notwithstanding

G.S. 108D-40

, individuals receiving this Medicaid coverage shall not be covered by capitated prepaid health plan contracts under Article 4 of Chapter 108D of the General Statutes.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2020-88, s. 12(b), effective July 2, 2020, added subdivision (a)(5a).

Session Laws 2021-62, ss. 4.8(b), (c), effective July 1, 2021, substituted “Recipients who meet the definition of Indian under 42 C.F.R. § 438.14(a)” for “Members of federally recognized tribes. Members of federally recognized tribes” at the beginning of subdivision (a)(5), and deleted subdivision (a)(5a), which read: “Eligible recipients who are enrolled in a DHHS-contracted Indian managed care entity, as defined in 42 C.F.R. § 438.14(a).”

§ 108D-45.
Number and nature of capitated PHP contracts.

The number and nature of the contracts required under G.S. 108D-65(3) shall be as follows:

Four contracts between the Division of Health Benefits and PHPs to provide coverage to Medicaid and NC Health Choice recipients statewide.

Up to 12 contracts between the Division of Health Benefits and PLEs for coverage of regions specified by the Division of Health Benefits pursuant to G.S. 108D-65(2). Regional contracts shall be in addition to the four statewide contracts required under subdivision (1) of this section. Each regional contract shall provide coverage throughout the entire region for the Medicaid and NC Health Choice services required by

G.S. 108D-35

. A PLE may bid for more than one regional contract, provided that the regions are contiguous.

The limitations on the number of contracts established in this section shall not apply to BH IDD tailored plans described in

G.S. 108D-60

.

Initial capitated PHP contracts may be awarded on staggered terms of three to five years in duration to ensure against gaps in coverage that may result from termination of a contract by the PHP or the State.

History.

2015-245, s. 4; 2016-121, s. 2(b); 2018-48, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 14(a).

Editor’s Note.

Subdivision (6) of Session Laws 2015-245, s. 4, as amended by Session Laws 2016-121, s. 2(b), and Session Laws 2018-48, s. 1, was codified as this section by Session Laws 2019-81, s. 14(a)(5), effective October 1, 2019.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 14(a)(5) provides, in part, that: “the words ‘(statewide contracts)’ and ‘(regional contracts)’ shall be removed.” The text of the section was codified accordingly.

Pursuant to Session Laws 2019-81, s. 14(b)(2), the reference to “subdivision (3) of

G.S. 108D-65

“subdivision (3) of this section.”

§ 108D-50.
Defined measures and goals.

The new delivery system and capitated PHP contracts shall be built on defined measures and goals for risk-adjusted health outcomes, quality of care, patient satisfaction, access, and cost. Each component shall be subject to specific accountability measures, including penalties. The Division of Health Benefits may use organizations such as National Committee for Quality Assurance (NCQA), Physician Consortium for Performance Improvement (PCPI), or any others necessary to develop effective measures for outcomes and quality.

History.

2015-245, s. 4; 2019-81, s. 14(a).

Editor’s Note.

Subdivision (7) of Session Laws 2015-245, s. 4, was codified as this section by Session Laws 2019-81, s. 14(a)(6), effective October 1, 2019.

§ 108D-55.
Administrative functions.

PHPs shall be responsible for all administrative functions for recipients enrolled in their plan, including, but not limited to, claims processing, care and case management, grievances and appeals, and other necessary administrative services.

History.

2015-245, s. 4; 2019-81, s. 14(a).

Editor’s Note.

Subdivision (8) of Session Laws 2015-245, s. 4, was codified as this section by Session Laws 2019-81, s. 14(a)(7), effective October 1, 2019.